Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3007.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.265, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Preapplication evaluation of large water appropriation projects. new text end new text begin (a) This subdivision applies to a project for which the proposed consumptive use exceeds 100,000,000 gallons per year or 250,000 gallons per day, whether under an existing permit, as the result of a permit amendment, or under a new individual permit. new text end new text begin (b) To ensure that a project is compatible with the needs of other current and future water users, to help maintain the water allocation priorities established under section 103G.261, to ensure adequate water supply in areas of the state with limited water availability, and to promote a more efficient and timely permitting process, potential applicants or persons working on behalf of potential applicants are encouraged to discuss the project with the commissioner as early in the project development process as possible, preferably before a final project site has been selected, project design has been finalized, or land has been acquired. new text end new text begin (c) A city or county employee who has been contacted by a person regarding a project that is likely to be subject to this subdivision must, even if no final decision has been made on the project's location, notify the commissioner in writing within ten business days of the contact, providing the name of and contact information for the person and potential project locations. new text end new text begin (d) In response to a contact from a potential applicant, the commissioner may request preapplication information that is helpful in assisting the commissioner to assess the factors affecting the ability of a water source to meet a project's water use needs at potential locations, including: new text end new text begin (1) a project description, including all potential locations; new text end new text begin (2) the project's estimated maximum daily, seasonal, and annual water use rates and volumes; new text end new text begin (3) the anticipated source of water; new text end new text begin (4) water quality or temperature requirements; and new text end new text begin (5) any additional information the commissioner requires to assist in assessing the ability of a water source to meet a project's water use needs. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner must evaluate the information supplied by a potential applicant under this subdivision and must respond in writing, which may be electronically transmitted, describing potential water availability constraints at each potential project location. new text end new text begin (f) In determining the impact of a potential project on water quality and quantity, the commissioner may consult with the commissioners of health, agriculture, the Pollution Control Agency, and other state agencies. new text end new text begin (g) Any communication made or information exchanged under this subdivision between a potential applicant and a government agency, or between government agencies, is nonpublic data, as defined in section 13.02, until the project is either abandoned or the applicant files an application for a water use permit under section 103G.285 or 103G.287, after which the data is public. new text end new text begin (h) None of the discussions, filings, or evaluations made under this subdivision preclude or supplant environmental review, preliminary well construction approval, appropriation permit review, or any other requirements under federal, state, or local law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 103G.271, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5b. new text end new text begin Large water appropriation projects; permit conditions. new text end new text begin In issuing water-use permits to applicants that meet the criteria in section 103G.265, subdivision 5, the commissioner must ensure that: new text end new text begin (1) water resources of the state are used in the public interest and public health, safety, and welfare are adequately protected; new text end new text begin (2) technologies that promote water conservation and the efficient use of water are fully considered; and new text end new text begin (3) water use conflicts are addressed as prescribed in Minnesota Rules, part 6115.0740. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 116D.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 18. new text end new text begin Data centers; environmental review. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the proposed construction of a data center or the expansion of the average hourly load of an existing data center by 100 megawatts or more requires preparation of an environmental impact statement according to subdivision 2a. The responsible governmental unit for the environmental impact statement is the Public Utilities Commission. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "average hourly load" means the amount of electricity consumed by a facility each hour, averaged over an entire year. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end